Illinois, session 104th, HB3004.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 3-600 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-600)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-600)7    Sec. 3-600. Requirements for issuance of special plates. 8    (a) The Secretary of State shall issue only special plates 9that have been authorized by the General Assembly. Except as 10provided in subsection (a-5), the Secretary of State shall not 11issue a series of special plates, or Universal special plates 12associated with an organization authorized to issue decals for 13Universal special plates, unless applications, as prescribed 14by the Secretary and including applications in process, have 15been received for 250 2,000 plates of that series. Where a 16special plate is authorized by law to raise funds for a 17specific civic group, charitable entity, or other identified 18organization, or when the civic group, charitable entity, or 19organization is authorized to issue decals for Universal 20special license plates, and where the Secretary of State has 21not received the required number of applications to issue that 22special plate within 2 years of the effective date of the 23Public Act authorizing the special plate or decal, the   HB3004- 2 -LRB104 08903 LNS 18958 b1Secretary of State's authority to issue the special plate or a 2Universal special plate associated with that decal is 3nullified. All applications for special plates shall be on a 4form designated by the Secretary and shall be accompanied by 5any civic group's, charitable entity's, or other identified 6fundraising organization's portion of the additional fee 7associated with that plate or decal. All fees collected under 8this Section are non-refundable and shall be deposited in the 9special fund as designated in the enabling legislation, 10regardless of whether the plate or decal is produced. Upon the 11adoption of this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly, 12no further special license plates shall be authorized by the 13General Assembly unless that special license plate is 14authorized under subsection (a-5) of this Section. 15    (a-5) If the General Assembly authorizes the issuance of a 16special plate that recognizes the applicant's military service 17or receipt of a military medal or award, the Secretary may 18immediately begin issuing that special plate. 19    (b) The Secretary of State, upon issuing a new series of 20special license plates, shall notify all law enforcement 21officials of the design, color and other special features of 22the special license plate series.23    (c) This Section shall not apply to the Secretary of 24State's discretion as established in Section 3-611.25    (d) If a law authorizing a special license plate provides 26that the sponsoring organization is to designate a charitable   HB3004- 3 -LRB104 08903 LNS 18958 b1entity as the recipient of the funds from the sale of that 2license plate, the designated charitable entity must be in 3compliance with the registration and reporting requirements of 4the Charitable Trust Act and the Solicitation for Charity Act. 5In addition, the charitable entity must annually provide the 6Secretary of State's office a letter of compliance issued by 7the Illinois Attorney General's office verifying the entity is 8in compliance with the Acts.9    In the case of a law in effect before the effective date of 10this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly, the name of 11the charitable entity which is to receive the funds shall be 12provided to the Secretary of State within one year after the 13effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General 14Assembly. In the case of a law that takes effect on or after 15the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th General 16Assembly, the name of the charitable entity which is to 17receive the funds shall be provided to the Secretary of State 18within one year after the law takes effect. If the 19organization fails to designate an appropriate charitable 20entity within the one-year period, or if the designated 21charitable entity fails to annually provide the Secretary of 22State a letter of compliance issued by the Illinois Attorney 23General's office, any funds collected from the sale of plates 24authorized for that organization and not previously disbursed 25shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund, and the 26special plates shall be discontinued.  HB3004- 4 -LRB104 08903 LNS 18958 b1    (e) If fewer than 1,000 sets of any special license plate 2authorized by law and issued by the Secretary of State are 3actively registered for 2 consecutive calendar years, the 4Secretary of State may discontinue the issuance of that 5special license plate or require that special license plate to 6be exchanged for Universal special plates with appropriate 7decals.8    (f) Where special license plates have been discontinued 9pursuant to subsection (d) or (e) of this Section, or when the 10special license plates are required to be exchanged for 11Universal special plates under subsection (e) of this Section, 12all previously issued plates of that type shall be recalled. 13Owners of vehicles which were registered with recalled plates 14shall not be charged a reclassification or registration 15sticker replacement plate fee upon the issuance of new plates 16for those vehicles. 17    (g) Any special plate that is authorized to be issued for 18motorcycles may also be issued for autocycles. 19    (h) The Secretary may use alternating numeric and 20alphabetical characters when issuing a special registration 21plate authorized under this Chapter.22    (i) The Secretary of State may issue digital registration 23plates and stickers in accordance with this Section and 24Section 3-401.5.25(Source: P.A. 100-956, eff. 1-1-19; 101-395, eff. 8-16-19.)